Washington statutes.
RCW 19.52.110

Limitations in chapter not applicable to interest charged by broker-dealers—When.

The interest charged by any broker-dealer registered under chapter 21.20 RCW and under the federal securities and exchange act of 1934, as amended, shall not be subject to the limitations imposed by this chapter if the underlying loans (1) may be paid in full at the option of the borrower and (2) are subject to the credit regulations of the board of governors of the federal reserve system, or its successor.

[ 1981 c 79 s 1.]